Connecticut, session 2026, HB05300.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 17b-106 of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective from passage):
4 (b) The commissioner shall provide a state supplement payment for
5 recipients of Medicaid and the federal Supplemental Security Income
6 Program who reside in long-term care facilities sufficient to increase
7 their personal needs allowance to seventy-five dollars per month. On
8 July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the commissioner shall increase
9 such state supplement payment over that of the previous fiscal year by
10 an amount sufficient to increase such personal needs allowance by an
11 amount equal to twenty-five per cent of the annual cost-of-living
12 adjustment in the federal Supplemental Security Income Program, if
13 any. Such state supplement payment shall be made to the long-term care
HB5300 / File No. 43 1

HB5300 File No. 43
14 facility to be deposited into the personal fund account of each such
15 recipient. For the purposes of this subsection, "long-term care facility"
16 means a licensed chronic and convalescent nursing home, a chronic
17 disease hospital, a rest home with nursing supervision, an intermediate
18 care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities or a state
19 humane institution.
20 Sec. 2. Section 17b-272 of the general statutes is repealed and the
21 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
22 The Commissioner of Social Services shall permit patients residing in
23 nursing homes, chronic disease hospitals and state humane institutions
24 who are medical assistance recipients under sections 17b-260 to 17b-262,
25 inclusive, 17b-264 to 17b-285, inclusive, and 17b-357 to 17b-361,
26 inclusive, to have a monthly personal fund allowance of seventy-five
27 dollars, adjusted annually on and after July 1, 2026, in accordance with
28 section 17b-106, as amended by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 17b-106(b)
Sec. 2 from passage 17b-272
AGE Joint Favorable
HB5300 / File No. 43 2

HB5300 File No. 43
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost 600,000 1,200,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS) of
approximately $600,000 in FY 27 and $1.2 million in FY 28 due to
increasing the Personal Needs Allowance (PNA). The bill requires DSS
to annually increase the PNA by an amount equal to twenty-five per
cent of the annual cost-of-living adjustment (COLA) in the federal
Supplemental Security Income (SSI) Program. This is anticipated to
increase the PNA by approximately $7 per month in FY 27 with a similar
monthly increase in FY 28.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to COLA adjustments to SSI.
HB5300 / File No. 43 3

HB5300 File No. 43
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5300
AN ACT CONCERNING COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENTS TO
LONG-TERM CARE FACILITY RESIDENTS' PERSONAL NEEDS
ALLOWANCE.